New Jersey, session 222, S2583.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Commencing on July 1 next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and annually thereafter, there shall be appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health a minimum amount of $10,000,000 for Public Health Priority Funding, to be expended in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1966, c.36 (C.26:2F-1 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.